California, session 20252026, AB233.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23388 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:23388. A licensed beer manufacturer or a licensed beer wholesaler, in addition to selling beer at their licensed premises, may sell beer from wagons, trailers, or trucks operated by them to licensees authorized to sell beer.